Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.440

Manufactured and mobile home installation service and warranty service standards—Enforcement.

(1) The legislature finds that inspections of manufactured and mobile home installation are not done on a consistent basis. Manufactured and mobile homes provide housing for many people in the state, and improperly installed manufactured or mobile homes are a serious health and safety risk. Where possible and practical, manufactured and mobile homes should be treated the same as any housing inhabited or to be inhabited by persons in this state, including housing built according to the state building code.

(2) In consultation with the factory assembled structures advisory board for manufactured homes, the director of labor and industries shall by rule establish uniform standards for the performance and workmanship of installation service and warranty service by persons or entities engaged in performing the services within this state for all manufactured and mobile homes, as defined in RCW 46.04.302. The standards shall conform, where applicable, with statutes, rules, and recommendations established under the national manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401 et seq.). These rules regarding the installation of manufactured and mobile homes shall be enforced and fees charged by the counties and cities in the same manner the state building code is enforced under RCW 19.27.050.

(3) In addition to and in conjunction with the remedies provided in this chapter, failure to remedy any breach of the standards and rules so established, upon adequate notice and within a reasonable time, is a violation of the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW and subject to the remedies provided in that chapter.

[ 2001 c 335 s 6; 1988 c 239 s 5; 1980 c 153 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.